Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.aff
FLAG num
PFX 612 0 gũkaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a gũka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a gũkaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e gũke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gũge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e gũgee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i gũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gũkaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i gũgaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gũkee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ gũgee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gũko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gũkoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gũgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ gũgoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gũko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gũkoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gũgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o gũgoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a gũgaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 gũga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 gũgaa [ckt]
PFX 612 0 haka [bghmnr]	
PFX 612 0 hakaa [bghmnr] 	
PFX 612 a haka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 612 a hakaa a[^cktĩ] 	
PFX 612 e hake e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e hage e[cktĩ]	
PFX 612 e hagee e[cktĩ]		
PFX 612 i hakai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i hakaai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 i hagai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 i hagaai i[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ hake ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ hakee ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ hage ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ĩ hagee ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ hako ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ hakoo ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ hago ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 ũ hagoo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o hako o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o hakoo o[^cktĩ]
PFX 612 o hago o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 o hagoo o[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a haga a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 a hagaa a[cktĩ]
PFX 612 0 haga [ckt]
PFX 612 0 hagaa [ckt]

# Negation, All Noun Classes Subject, Assumed Object, Remote Future, Present Consecutive -kaa, -ka
PFX 712 Y 206
PFX 712 0 ndika [bghmnr]
PFX 712 a ndika a[^ckt]
PFX 712 e ndike e[^ckt]
PFX 712 ĩ ndike ĩ[^ckt]
PFX 712 o ndiko o[^ckt]
PFX 712 ũ ndiko ũ[^ckt
PFX 712 0 ndiga [ckt]
PFX 712 a ndiga a[ckt]
PFX 712 e ndige e[ckt]
PFX 712 ĩ ndige ĩ[ckt]
PFX 712 o ndigo o[ckt]
PFX 712 ũ ndigo ũ[ckt
PFX 712 0 tũtika [bghmnr]
PFX 712 a tũtika a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e tũtike e[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 e tũtige e[cktĩ]
PFX 712 i tũtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i tũtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ tũtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ tũtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ tũtiko ũ[^ckt]
PFX 712 ũ tũtigo ũ[ckt]
PFX 712 a tũtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 tũtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 ndũka [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a ndũka a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e ndũke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e ndũge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i ndũkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i ndũgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndũke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndũge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndũko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndũgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndũko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndũgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a ndũga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 ndũga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 mũtika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a mũtika a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e mũtike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e mũtige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i mũtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i mũtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ mũtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ mũtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ mũtiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ mũtigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o mũtiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o mũtigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a mũtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 mũtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 ndaka [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a ndaka a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e ndake e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e ndage e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i ndakai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i ndagai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndake ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndage ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndako ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndago ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndako o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndago o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a ndaga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 ndaga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 matika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a matika a[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e matike e[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 e matige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i matikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i matigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ matike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ matige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ matiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ matigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o matiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o matigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a matiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 matiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 ndĩka [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a ndĩka a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e ndĩke e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e ndĩge e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i ndĩkai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i ndĩgai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndĩke ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ ndĩge ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndĩko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ ndĩgo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndĩko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o ndĩgo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a ndĩga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 ndĩga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 rĩtika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a rĩtika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e rĩtike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e rĩtige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i rĩtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i rĩtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ rĩtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ rĩtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ rĩtiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ rĩtigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o rĩtiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o rĩtigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a rĩtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 rĩtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 gĩtika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a gĩtika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e gĩtike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e gĩtige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i gĩtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i gĩtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gĩtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gĩtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gĩtiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gĩtigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gĩtiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gĩtigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a gĩtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 gĩtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 itika [bghmnr]		
PFX 712 a itika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e itike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e itige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i itikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i itigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ itike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ itige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ itiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ itigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o itiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o itigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a itiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 itiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 citika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a citika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e citike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e citige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i citikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i citigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ citike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ citige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ citiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ citigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o citiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o citigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a citiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 citiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 rũtika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a rũtika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e rũtike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e rũtige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i rũtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i rũtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ rũtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ rũtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ rũtiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ rũtigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o rũtiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o rũtigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a rũtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 rũtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 gatika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a gatika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e gatike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e gatige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i gatikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i gatigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gatike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gatige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gatiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gatigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gatiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gatigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a gatiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 gatiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 gũtika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a gũtika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e gũtike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e gũtige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i gũtikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i gũtigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gũtike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ gũtige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gũtiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ gũtigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gũtiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o gũtigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a gũtiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 gũtiga [ckt]
PFX 712 0 hatika [bghmnr]	
PFX 712 a hatika a[^cktĩ]	 	
PFX 712 e hatike e[^cktĩ]	
PFX 712 e hatige e[cktĩ]	
PFX 712 i hatikai i[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 i hatigai i[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ hatike ĩ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ĩ hatige ĩ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ hatiko ũ[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 ũ hatigo ũ[cktĩ]
PFX 712 o hatiko o[^cktĩ]
PFX 712 o hatigo o[cktĩ]
PFX 712 a hatiga a[cktĩ]
PFX 712 0 hatiga [ckt]
