Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/kik_KE.dic
ahũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ambĩrĩria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
anĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
aria/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
baanga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
bokera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
caca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
canjamũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ceera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ciinda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
cira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
conora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
cũna/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
enda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
ereera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
eterera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gariũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gaĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
genda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gooca/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
gunda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
guucia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
gĩĩra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haica/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
handa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
haragana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
heana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hena/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hiiha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hingũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hoboka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
hoota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
huka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hunja/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
huunya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩnga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hĩtũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũrũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
hũũnga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
igana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ikia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
inama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
inũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
iyũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kaya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kiya/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
komora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
kua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kundĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kuruma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kuunda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũngũira/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
kũũrana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
meemia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
menyithia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
monyoka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
mĩa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ng'athia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ng'otha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
nina/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nuunga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
nyita/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ohora/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
orota/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
randũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
reenga/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rekia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
rigica/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ririkana/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rua/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ruruma/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũgama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
rũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tahĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tanuka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tega/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tembea/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
terema/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thaama/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thambia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thegea/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thera/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
thingũra/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thiũrũrũka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thugunda/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
thũngũtha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tiritha/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
toorekia/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
tungata/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
tweka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,452,480,482
umbĩka/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũa/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
ũngania/611,711,612,712,613,713,614,714,450,451,480,481
